Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-549
Fire prevention; regulations.

Second-class cities and villages shall have power to regulate the construction of and order the suppression and cleaning of fireplaces, chimneys, stoves, stovepipes, ovens, boilers, kettles, forges or any apparatus used in any building, manufactory or business which may be dangerous in causing or promoting fires, and to prescribe the limits within which no dangerous or obnoxious and offensive business may be carried on.

Laws 1879, § 69, XVIII, p. 214;

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, XVIII, p. 182;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, XVIII, p. 173;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, XVIII, p. 301;

R.S.1913, § 5123;

C.S.1922, § 4298;

C.S.1929, § 17-447;

R.S.1943, § 17-549.